Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB229.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 337 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Emergency" means an unforeseen situation that
1. Threatens an employee, customer, or the public;
2. Disrupts or shuts down operations; or
3. Causes physical or environmental damage;
(b) "Nonworking hours" means hours before or after an employee's assigned
hours of work, regardless of whether assigned hours are stated in their job
description; and
(c) "Right to disconnect" means that an employee has the right to ignore
communications from the employer during nonworking hours, except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) (a) Every employer shall establish a workplace policy that provides employees
the right to disconnect from communications from the employer during
nonworking hours.
(b) Nonworking hours shall be established by written agreement between an
employer and employee.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, any employer may contact an
employee during nonworking hours for an emergency or for scheduling
purposes.
(4) This section shall not apply to employees covered by a collective bargaining
agreement.
(5) Any employer who violates the right to disconnect workplace policy three (3) or
more times shall be fined in accordance with subsection (10) of Section 2 of this
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/6/2025 12:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 994
Act.
Section 2. KRS 337.990 is amended to read as follows:
The following civil penalties shall be imposed by the Education and Labor Cabinet, in
accordance with the provisions in KRS 336.985, for violations of the provisions of this
chapter:
(1) Any firm, individual, partnership, or corporation that violates KRS 337.020 shall be
assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense. Each failure to pay an employee the
wages when due him under KRS 337.020 shall constitute a separate offense;[.]
(2) Any employer who violates KRS 337.050 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000);[.]
(3) Any employer who violates KRS 337.055 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000)
for each offense and shall make full payment to the employee by reason of the
violation. Each failure to pay an employee the wages as required by KRS 337.055
shall constitute a separate offense;[.]
(4) Any employer who violates KRS 337.060 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000)
and shall also be liable to the affected employee for the amount withheld, plus
interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum;[.]
(5) Any employer who violates the provisions of KRS 337.065 shall be assessed a civil
penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000) for each offense and shall make full payment to the employee by
reason of the violation;[.]
(6) Any person who fails to comply with KRS 337.070 shall be assessed a civil penalty
of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/6/2025 12:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 994
($1,000) for each offense and each day that the failure continues shall be deemed a
separate offense;[.]
(7) Any employer who violates any provision of KRS 337.275 to 337.325, KRS
337.345, and KRS 337.385 to 337.405, or willfully hinders or delays the
commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative in the performance
of his or her duties under KRS 337.295, or fails to keep and preserve any records as
required under KRS 337.320 and 337.325, or falsifies any record, or refuses to
make any record or transcription thereof accessible to the commissioner or the
commissioner's authorized representative shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
A civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be assessed for
any subsequent violation of KRS 337.285(4) to (9) and each day the employer
violates KRS 337.285(4) to (9) shall constitute a separate offense and penalty;[.]
(8) Any employer who pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate less than the rate
applicable under KRS 337.275 and 337.285, or any wage order issued pursuant
thereto shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100)
nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000);[.]
(9) Any employer who discharges or in any other manner discriminates against any
employee because the employee has made any complaint to his or her employer, to
the commissioner, or to the commissioner's authorized representative that he or she
has not been paid wages in accordance with KRS 337.275 and 337.285 or
regulations issued thereunder, or because the employee has caused to be instituted
or is about to cause to be instituted any proceeding under or related to KRS
337.385, or because the employee has testified or is about to testify in any such
proceeding, shall be deemed in violation of KRS 337.275 to 337.325, KRS 337.345,
and KRS 337.385 to 337.405 and shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than
one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000);[.]
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/6/2025 12:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 994
(10) Any employer who violates KRS 337.355 or 337.365 or Section 1 of this Act shall
be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000); and[.]
(11) A person shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars
($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) when that person discharges or
in any other manner discriminates against an employee because the employee has:
(a) Made any complaint to his or her employer, the commissioner, or any other
person; or
(b) Instituted, or caused to be instituted, any proceeding under or related to KRS
337.420 to 337.433; or
(c) Testified, or is about to testify, in any such proceedings.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/6/2025 12:20 PM Jacketed